Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1455.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 46.4, as
last amended by Section 4, Chapter 138, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 46.4), is amended to read as follows:
Section 46.4. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2026 July 1, 2031, in accordance with the provisions of the
Oklahoma Sunset Law, a board to be known as the “Board of Governors
of the Architects, Landscape Architects and Licensed Interior
Designers of Oklahoma”, hereinafter referred to as the Board. The
Board shall be composed of eleven (11) members including six persons
who are duly licensed to practice architecture and are in good
standing in this state, two persons who are duly licensed to
practice landscape architecture and are in good standing in this
state, two persons who are duly licensed interior designers and who
are active and in good standing, and one lay member. Each member of

the Board shall be a qualified elector of this state, and the
architect, landscape architect, and licensed interior designer
members shall have had five (5) years’ licensing experience as the
professional position requires in this state. Re-creation of the
Board shall not alter existing staggered terms. Board members,
other than the lay member, shall be appointed for a period of five
(5) years thereafter; provided, that nothing herein shall affect the
tenure of office of anyone who is a member of the Board on May 31,
1957. A member may be reappointed to succeed such membership. The
architect, landscape architect, or the licensed interior designer
members may be appointed by the Governor from a list of nominees
submitted by respective professional societies of this state.
Membership in a professional society shall not be a prerequisite to
appointment to the Board. The lay member of the Board shall be
appointed by the Governor to a term coterminous with that of the
Governor. The lay member shall serve at the pleasure of the
Governor. Provided, the lay member may continue to serve after the
expiration of the term of the member until such time as a successor
is appointed. Vacancies which may occur in the membership of the
Board shall be filled by appointment by the Governor. Each person
who has been appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve for the
remainder of the term for which the member the person shall whom he
or she will succeed was appointed and until a successor, in turn,
has been appointed and shall have qualified. Each member of the
Board, before entering upon the discharge of the duties of the
member, shall make and file with the Secretary of State a written
oath or affirmation for the faithful discharge of official duties.
Each member of the Board and staff shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses pursuant to the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1455 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 11th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1455 Page 3